Georgia, session 2025_26, HB530.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
Article 4 of Chapter 9 of Title 15 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to time,
place, and procedure, is amended by adding a new Code section to read as follows:
"15-9-86.2.
(a)(1) On or before January 1, 2028, in conformance with standards and rules
promulgated by the Council of Probate Court Judges of Georgia, and except as provided
in paragraph (3) of this subsection, all probate courts shall provide for the electronic
filing of all pleadings and any other document related thereto in any civil matter in a
probate court and provide for the acceptance of payments and remittances by electronic
means.
H. B. 530
- 1 -

LC 48 1457
(2) Except as provided in paragraph (3) of this subsection, a court's electronic filing
service provider may charge a fee which shall be a recoverable court cost and only
include a:
(A) One-time fee for electronically filing pleadings or documents in a civil action and
the electronic service of pleadings, regardless of how many parties shall be served,
which shall not exceed $30.00 per filer, per case. Such fee shall be paid at the time of
the first filing on behalf of a party, provided that, when filings are submitted via a
public access terminal, such fee shall be paid upon the first filing not using such
terminal; and
(B) Convenience fee for credit card and bank drafting services, which shall not exceed
3.5 percent, plus a 30¢ payment services fee per transaction.
(3) No electronic filing service provider shall charge a fee pursuant to this subsection for
the filing of:
(A) Pleadings or documents filed by any local, state, or federal office, officer, or
agency;
(B) Pleadings or documents filed on behalf of municipal corporations or county
governments;
(C) Leaves of absence or conflict notices filed pursuant to the Uniform Rules for the
Probate Courts; or
(D) Pleadings or documents filed by attorneys appointed by the probate court to
represent the interest of any party or filed by guardians ad litem.
(4) With respect to the fee charged pursuant to subparagraph (A) of paragraph (2) of this
subsection, the probate court shall retain $2.00 of the transaction fee and remit it to the
governing authority of the county. No other portion of such transaction fee shall be
remitted to any other office or entity of the state or governing authority of a county or
municipality.
H. B. 530
- 2 -

LC 48 1457
(5) An attorney, or party if he or she is self-represented, shall be allowed unlimited
access to view and download any pleading or document electronically filed in connection
to the civil action in which he or she is counsel of record or a self-represented litigant,
and an electronic service provider shall not be authorized to charge or collect a fee for
such viewing or downloading.
(6) This subsection shall not apply to filings in connection with:
(A) A pauper's affidavit;
(B) Pleadings or documents filed under seal or presented to a court in camera or ex
parte;
(C) Pleadings or documents to which access is otherwise restricted by law or court
order:
(i) Made electronically at the courthouse via a public access terminal in the clerk's
office, but when payment is submitted by credit card or bank draft, the clerk may
charge the convenience fee as set forth in subparagraph (B) of paragraph (2) of this
subsection; or
(ii) Made in a court located in an area that has been declared to be in a state of
emergency pursuant to Article 3 of Chapter 3 of Title 38. The Judicial Council of
Georgia shall provide rules for filings in such circumstances; or
(D) Filings made prior to the commencement of electronic filing provided for in this
Code section, wherein the filer shall continue to pay fees applicable to the case on the
date of the first filing; provided, however, that a party may elect to make future filings
through the court's electronic filing service provider and pay the applicable fees.
(7) Each probate court shall develop and enact policies and procedures necessary to carry
out the standards and rules created by the Council of Probate Court Judges of Georgia.
(b) Nothing in this Code section shall be construed to prevent a court's acceptance of
payments and remittances by electronic means under the court's own authority.
H. B. 530
- 3 -

LC 48 1457
(c) A judge to whom the case is assigned and his or her staff shall, at all times, have access
to all pleadings and documents electronically filed, and such access shall be provided upon
the electronic acceptance of such pleadings and documents by the court.
(d) Any pleading or document filed electronically shall be deemed filed as of the time of
its receipt by the electronic filing service provider. A pleading or document filed
electronically shall not be subject to disclosure until it has been accepted by the court.
Upon such acceptance as provided for in this subsection, such pleading or document shall
be publicly accessible for viewing at no cost to the viewer on a public access terminal
available at the courthouse during regular business hours unless otherwise prohibited or
limited by law."
SECTION 2.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 530
- 4 -